Ohio, session 136, SB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.213 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.213. The twentieth day of February is designated as "Black Ohioan Civil War Medal of Honor Recipient Day" to honor Black soldiers from Ohio who received the congressional medal of honor for their actions during the American civil war.